Massachusetts, session 194th, H3499.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Chapter 164 is hereby amended by adding the following section: 
Section 149.  
Section 1.  
(a) The department of energy resources shall ensure equity, accessibility, and 
promote participation by renters and low-income retail electric customers in the solar incentive 
program established in section 11 of chapter 75 of the acts of 2016, and in any successor solar 
incentive program, by implementing a low-income customer verification process in which low 
income customers shall be persons whose income is at or below 80 percent of the area median 

of 3 9 income or 200 percent of the federal poverty level or is a small business, who are, for the 
purposes of this section defined as business entities, including their affiliates that are (i) 
independently owned and operated; and (ii) are defined as a “small business” under applicable 
federal law, as established in the United States Code and promulgated from time to time by the 
United States Small Business Administration. 
(b) A low-income multi-unit building that meets the definition under M.G.L. c. 40B, 
§ 20 or otherwise receives tax credits under the U.S. Department of Housing and Urban 
Development Low-Income Housing Tax Credit program shall qualify as one Low Income 
Customer. 
(c) In the implementation of the program, the department shall:  
(i) Require income data verification to determine eligibility for low-income 
customers. Proof of eligibility required for low-income customers shall include one or more than 
one of the following: proof of participation in a low income discount program including 
Medicaid; Supplemental Security Income; Temporary Assistance for Needy Families; Women, 
Infants, and Children Nutrition Program; Low Income Home Energy Assistance Program; 
Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program or food stamps; Head Start; National School Lunch 
Program; Emergency Aid to the Elderly, Disabled, and Children; School Breakfast Program; 
Public Housing; Transitional Aide to Families with Dependent Children; Veterans’ Service 
Benefits established in Chapter 115 of the Massachusetts General Laws; Veterans Dependency 
and Indemnity Compensation Surviving Parent or Spouse; Veterans Non-Service Disability 
Pension; Fuel Assistance; or proof that the residential Low-income Customer lives in or is a 
business entity located in a Census block group where the median household income is at or 

of 3 31 below 200 percent of the U.S. Federal Poverty Guidelines or 80 percent of the area median gross 
income published by the United States Census Bureau, whichever is greater;  by living in or 
owning a low-income multi-unit building, including those that are master-metered; or proof of 
income of the account holder including pay stubs or form W-2; or any verification method 
authorized by the U.S. Department of Treasury for qualified low-income economic benefit 
projects Investment Tax Credit (ITC) adder under United States Public Law 117-169 Section 
13103(2)(C); 
(ii) prohibit credit checks as a means of establishing eligibility for residential 
customers to become a subscriber;  
(iii)  prohibit the use of early termination and exit fees for residential customers;  
(iv) require distribution companies generating an alternative form of on-bill credits as 
approved by the department of public utilities from distributed solar generation facilities to 
accept and implement no less frequently than once per month any changes to the identities of 
designated recipients and amount of credits to be attributed to such recipients, as provided by the 
owner of the solar distributed generation facility; and 
(v) exempt low-income multi-unit building owners from bill credit maximums and 
subscriber count minimums for the host project. 
Section 2. The department shall promulgate regulations to implement this section within 
180 days.